Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-757
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-757 to 79-762 shall be known and may be cited
as the Quality Education Accountability Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1228, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 812, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB653, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB637, § 25;

Laws 2012, LB870, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB438, § 1.